District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.03

Water supply; rules and regulations.

Full power is given to the Mayor of the District of Columbia to supply the inhabitants of the District with the Potomac water from the aqueduct mains or pipes laid in the streets and avenues by the United States; and to the Council of the District of Columbia to make all laws and regulations for the proper distribution of the same, subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the control of the Chief of Engineers, as provided in § 51 [revised; see now 40 U.S.C. § 9502 ] of Title 40, United States Code. The supply of Potomac water may be extended to points in the District beyond the limits of Washington upon like terms and conditions as are provided by law for the supply of the same in that city.

R.S., D.C., § 195
June 20, 1874, 18 Stat. 116, ch. 337, § 2
June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 103, ch. 180, § 3
June 10, 1879, 21 Stat. 9, ch. 16
Feb. 25, 1885, 23 Stat. 319, ch. 145
Feb. 11, 1895, 28 Stat. 650, ch. 79

History

Mayor, council and other officers, police power regulations, see § 1-303.03.
Procurement, generally, see § 2-301.01 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 43-1503.
1973 Ed., § 43-1503.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(323) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government